Hawaii statutes.
§669-8 Recording of judgment. The
registrar of conveyances or the assistant registrar of the land court, as the
case may be, shall receive and record or file and register every certified copy
of judgment quieting title to property rendered by the circuit court under this
chapter whenever the certified copy of judgment is presented to the registrar
or assistant registrar for record or registration. [L Sp 1949, c 46, §1(c); RL
1955, §242-6; HRS §669-8; am L 1972, c 90, §12(e); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next